New York, session 2025-2026, A7998.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the cannabis law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 28-a to read as follows: 3 28-a. "Immature cannabis plant" means a non-flowering female cannabis 4 plant or a cannabis plant which does not have buds that may be observed 5 by visual examination. 6 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 72 of the cannabis law is amended to 7 read as follows: 8 1. A retail dispensary license shall authorize the acquisition, 9 possession, sale and delivery of cannabis, and sale of up to three imma- 10 ture cannabis plants per person for personal cultivation, from the 11 licensed premises of the retail dispensary by such licensee to cannabis 12 consumers. 13 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 73 of the cannabis law is amended to 14 read as follows: 15 1. A microbusiness license shall authorize the limited cultivation, 16 processing, distribution, delivery, and dispensing of their own adult- 17 use cannabis and cannabis products. A microbusiness license shall also 18 authorize the sale of up to three immature cannabis plants per person 19 for personal cultivation. 20 § 4. Subdivision 1 of section 75 of the cannabis law is amended to 21 read as follows: 22 1. A nursery license shall authorize the production, sale and distrib- 23 ution of clones, immature plants, seeds, and other agricultural products 24 used specifically for the planting, propagation, and cultivation of 25 cannabis by licensed adult-use cultivators, cooperatives, microbusi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11234-02-5 A. 7998 2 1 nesses or registered organizations. A nursery license shall authorize 2 the sale of up to three immature cannabis plants per person for personal 3 cultivation. For the purposes of this section, the office shall provide 4 recommendations to the board for the application process, license crite- 5 ria and scope of licensed activities for this class of license. The 6 granting of such licenses shall promote social and economic equity 7 applicants as provided for in this chapter. 8 § 5. The New York state cannabis control board shall promulgate any 9 rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 10 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the New York state 12 cannabis control board is authorized to promulgate any rules and regu- 13 lations necessary to implement the provisions of this act on its effec- 14 tive date on or before such effective date.